apertium-yrl.yrl.lexd
LEXICON VerbRoot
kuntai:kuntai
aputári:aputári
umaã:umaã
puranga:puranga
su:su
pitá:pitá
munhã:munhã
sika:sika
usu:usu
apitá:apitá
iku:iku
paua:paua
purasi:purasi
kaú:kaú
ieréu:ieréu
kupíri:kupíri
mupinima:mupinima
purungitá:purungitá
iana:iana
mbaú:mbaú
ú:ú
uapika:uapika
kuau:kuau
iku:iku
uatá:uatá
sému:sému
manduári:manduári
nheẽ:nheẽ
ieuíri:ieuíri
amaité:amaité
ganáni:ganáni
iakau:iakau
iamĩ:iamĩ
iapumĩ:iapumĩ
iatiká:iatiká
iatiku:iatiku
iauau:iauau
iaxiú:iaxiú
ienũ:ienũ
ikúntu:ikúntu
ikupuku:ikupuku
iuka:iuka
iuká:iuká
iukuau:iukuau
iumaã:iumaã
iumana:iumana
iumbué:iumbué
iumeẽ:iumeẽ
iumími:iumími
iumũ:iumũ
iumuatíri:iumuatíri
iumuau:iumuau
iumuieréu:iumuieréu
iumukuaku:iumukuaku
iumunáni:iumunáni
iumunhã:iumunhã
iumupereua:iumupereua
iumuruaki:iumuruaki
iumusé:iumusé
iupíri:iupíri
iupiru:iupiru
iupiruka:iupiruka
iupukuã:iupukuã
iupukuári:iupukuári
iurau:iurau
iúri:iúri
iururéu:iururéu
iusikié:iusikié
iutuká:iutuká
iutima:iutima
kai:kai
kamundu:kamundu
karãi:karãi
kíri:kíri
kitika:kitika
kuau:kuau
kunheséri:kunheséri
kupíri:kupíri
maã:maã
maãi:maãi
maiana:maiana
manũ:manũ
mbeú:mbeú
mbirári:mbirári
mbué:mbué
mbúri:mbúri
meẽ:meẽ
memũi:memũi
mendári:mendári
muaku:muaku
muatíri:muatíri
muéu:muéu
muiana:muiana
muieréu:muieréu
mukameẽ:mukameẽ
mukuara:mukuara
mukuekatu:mukuekatu
mumurã:mumurã
mundá:mundá
mundeka:mundeka
mundéu:mundéu
mundu:mundu
mungaturu:mungaturu
mungitá:mungitá
munhã:munhã
munuka:munuka
mupaka:mupaka
mupaua:mupaua
mupereua:mupereua
mupinima:mupinima
mupipika:mupipika
mupuka:mupuka
mupuranga:mupuranga
mupuruã:mupuruã
muputira:muputira
murári:murári
muruaki:muruaki
mururu:mururu
musaimbé:musaimbé
musaka:musaka
musaku:musaku
musarai:musarai
musasá:musasá
musému:musému
musuri:musuri
mutauari:mutauari
mutianha:mutianha
mutini:mutini
mutipaua:mutipaua
muturusu:muturusu
naséri:naséri
nharu:nharu
nheengári:nheengári
paka:paka
parauaka:parauaka
paua:paua
peiú:peiú
pirári:pirári
piruka:piruka
piripana:piripana
pisika:pisika
pisirũ:pisirũ
pitá:pitá
pituú:pituú
puámu:puámu
puẽ:puẽ
puíri:puíri
puká:puká
pupeka:pupeka
pupuka:pupuka
purakai:purakai
puraki:puraki
purandu:purandu
purasi:purasi
púri:púri
putári:putári
puú:puú
puxirũ:puxirũ
rasu:rasu
riku:riku
ruári:ruári
rúri:rúri
saã:saã
sapi:sapi
saru:saru
sasá:sasá
sasému:sasému
sému:sému
sendu:sendu
senũi:senũi
seréu:seréu
sika:sika
sikári:sikári
suanti:suanti
suaxara:suaxara
suú:suú
suú-suú:suú-suú
tirika:tirika
titika:titika
tuká:tuká
uapika:uapika
uári:uári
uasému:uasému
uatá:uatá
uatá-uatá:uatá-uatá
uerá:uerá
ueué:ueué
uiié:uiié
uiké:uiké
upanhẽ:upanhẽ
xári:xári
xukui:xukui

LEXICON LexVerb
aikué:aikué

LEXICON FutureCopula
kuri:kuri

LEXICON AdjectiveRoot
panhẽ:panhẽ
suri:suri
katu:katu
mukũi:mukũi
musapíri:musapíri
irundi:irundi
pinima:pinima
puranga:puranga
tini:tini
turusu:turusu
saku:saku
puku:puku
kuere:kuere
iumasi:iumasi
marupiara:marupiara
aíua:aíua
apara:apara
apekatu:apekatu
auaeté:auaeté
auaité:auaité
bũa:bũa
iepeasu:iepeasu
ikeuara:ikeuara
irusanga:irusanga
iuakapura:iuakapura
iuakauara:iuakauara
iumasi:iumasi
iusi:iusi
kaapura:kaapura
kaauara:kaauara
kiá:kiá
kirá:kirá
kirimbaua:kirimbaua
kuaíra:kuaíra
kuekatu:kuekatu
kuera:kuera
kuere:kuere
kuximauara:kuximauara
maãsiiara:maãsiiara
maraári:maraári
membeka:membeka
mirĩ:mirĩ
munhangara:munhangara
murutinga:murutinga
piaíua:piaíua
piranga:piranga
pirasua:pirasua
pisasu:pisasu
pitua:pitua
pixuna:pixuna
puku:puku
pura:pura
pusé:pusé
puxi:puxi
raku:raku
reseuara:reseuara
rikué:rikué
ruri:ruri
saimbé:saimbé
santá:santá
sasiara:sasiara
sé:sé
seẽ:seẽ
sepiasu:sepiasu
sepiasuíma:sepiasuíma
suriuara:suriuara
suruka:suruka
tepusimanha:tepusimanha
teresému:teresému
ukauara:ukauara
iuiri:iuiri

LEXICON 1stPrnRoot(2)
ixé:ixé      <pers><p1><sg>:
indé:indé    <pers><p2><sg>:
aé:aé        <pers><p3><sg>:
iandé:iandé  <pers><p1><pl>:
penhẽ:penhẽ  <pers><p2><pl>:
aintá:aintá  <pers><p3><pl>:
ta:ta        <pers><p3><pl>:
kuá:kuá      <dem>:
nhaã:nhaã    <dem>:

LEXICON PxPrnRoot(2)
se:se        <pers><p1><sg><pos>:
ne:ne        <pers><p2><sg><pos>:
i:i          <pers><p3><sg><pos>:
yane:yane    <pers><p1><pl><pos>:
pe:pe        <pers><p2><pl><pos>:
aintá:aintá  <pers><p3><pl><pos>:
ta:ta        <pers><p3><pl><pos>:

LEXICON Postpositions
upé:upé
supé:supé
irũmu:irũmu
kiti:kiti
rupi:rupi
riré:riré
suí:suí
arama:arama
ruaki:ruaki
pukusaua:pukusaua
rupi:rupi
resé:resé
sesé:sesé
uaá:uaá
píri:píri
ararupi:ararupi
árupi:árupi
píri:píri
piterarupi:piterarupi
piterupé:piterupé
pitérupi:pitérupi
pukusaua:pukusaua
pupé:pupé
reseuara:reseuara
rakakuera:rakakuera
ramé:ramé
renundé:renundé
reseuara:reseuara
riré:riré
ruaki:ruaki
suiuara:suiuara
uirarupi:uirarupi
uirpe:uirpe

LEXICON Adverbs
niti:niti
umbaá:umbaá
uií:uií
siía:siía
ape:ape
maa:maa
nhaãsé:nhaãsé
asuí:asuí
kuaié:kuaié
iaué:iaué
píri:píri
rẽ:rẽ
akuera:akuera
amuramé:amuramé
anhũ:anhũ
ape:ape
apekatu:apekatu
aramé:aramé
aramenhúntu:aramenhúntu
asuí:asuí
eré:eré
ieperesé:ieperesé
iké:iké
iuíri:iuíri
kuá:kuá
kuaié:kuaié
kuemaité:kuemaité
kuesé:kuesé
kueséntu:kueséntu
kuíri:kuíri
kuité:kuité
kutara:kutara
kuxiíma:kuxiíma
mairamé:mairamé
maié:maié
makiti:makiti
mamé:mamé
marã:marã
marantaá:marantaá
marupi:marupi
masuí:masuí
merupi:merupi
mími:mími
nhúntu:nhúntu
niti:niti
raẽ:raẽ
rẽ:rẽ
retana:retana
reté:reté
tẽ:tẽ
té:té
tenhẽ:tenhẽ
tenhúntu:tenhúntu
ti:ti
timaã:timaã
uií:uií
uirandé:uirandé
ukáripe:ukáripe

LEXICON Conjunctions
uaá:uaá
ape:ape
asuí:asuí
iauerã:iauerã
iepé:iepé
kuité:kuité
maiaué:maiaué
maié:maié
maiepé:maiepé
mairamé:mairamé
nhaãsé:nhaãsé
nhaaresé:nhaaresé

PATTERN Number
Numeral+ [<num>:]

LEXICON Numeral
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9

LEXICON Punctuation
.<sent>:.
..<sent>:..
...<sent>:...
;<sent>:;
\:<sent>:\:
!<sent>:!
-<guio>:-
—<guio>:—
,<cm>:,
?<sent>:?
'<apos>:'
"<quot>:"
«<lquot>:«
»<rquot>:»
”<rquot>:”
“<lquot>:“
(<lpar>:(
\]<rpar>:\]
\[<lpar>:\[
)<rpar>:)
\\<sent>:\\
\/<sent>:\/

# Resources:
# https://github.com/apertium/lexd/blob/master/Usage.md
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/List_of_symbols
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
# https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
# https://github.com/hfst/
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
